Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB926.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Workplace Violence Prevention Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committee." The violence prevention committee established by a health facility under this act.12345678910111213141516 "Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employee." An individual who is employed by a health facility."Health facility." A hospital, long-term care nursing facility, home health care agency, abortion facility, ambulatory surgical facility, birth center or hospice, as those terms are defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act. The term includes a private psychiatric hospital and public psychiatric hospital as those terms are defined in 55 Pa. Code § 1151.2 (relating to definitions)."NONMANAGEMENT." CONCERNING AN EMPLOYEE WHO DOES NOT HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO EXERCISE INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT IN THE AREAS OF HIRING, FIRING, DISCIPLINING OR TRANSFERRING OTHER EMPLOYEES."Program." The workplace violence prevention program established by a committee."Workplace violence." Violence or the threat of violence against an employee that occurs during the course of employment or is substantially related to employment.Section 3. Violence prevention committee.(a) Establishment.--Each health facility shall establish a violence prevention committee to establish, review, administer and provide guidance about a program relating to the prevention of workplace violence at the health facility.(b) Membership.--The committee shall be composed as follows:(1) At least one member or designee of the committee shall represent management and oversee implementation of the program. The committee shall be led by two cochairs, one representing management and one representing the union 20250HB0926PN1597 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employees and nonunion employees in the case of a health facility that has no union representing its employees.(2) At least 50% of the members of the committee shall be nonmanagerial NONMANAGEMENT employees primarily engaged in direct patient care or clinical care services or employees who interface with the public. The committee shall have a proportional representation of union employees, selected by their union, and nonunion employees, NONMANAGEMENT EMPLOYEES elected by secret ballot by their peers. The proportional representation shall incorporate all employees at risk of becoming a victim of workplace violence and shall include representation from all main areas of the health facility that may be subject to workplace violence.(3) The remaining members of the committee shall be selected by management and shall have experience, expertise or responsibility relevant to violence prevention or other expertise that is considered beneficial to the committee.(4) THE COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIST OF AN EQUAL NUMBER OF MANAGEMENT AND NONMANAGEMENT EMPLOYEES. NONMANAGEMENT MEMBERS MUST MIRROR THE DEPARTMENTS AND UNITS THAT MANAGEMENT DESIGNATES AS MEMBERS TO THE COMMITTEE.(c) Compensation.--A health facility shall provide paid time to employees while the employees are participating in the violence prevention committee.Section 4. Duties of committee.(a) Risk assessment evaluation.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), each committee shall perform an initial risk assessment based on an analysis of incidents of the prior five years and then annually thereafter, as well as an evaluation of the factors 20250HB0926PN1597 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that may put an employee at risk of workplace violence. Those factors shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Working in a public setting.(ii) Guarding or maintaining property or possessions.(iii) Working in a high-crime area.(iv) Working late at night or early in the morning.(v) Using commuter lots that are not adequately lit or frequently patrolled.(vi) The existence of uncontrolled public access to the workplace.(vii) Working in a public area with individuals in crisis.(viii) Working in an area where a patient or resident may exhibit violent behavior or where there has been a pattern of violent behavior.(ix) Working in a unit that does not have adequate employee staffing levels.(x) The existence or availability of a security response team that is able to rapidly and effectively respond to incidents of workplace violence.(xi) Adequate training of employees to deal with incidents of workplace violence.(xii) The physical layout of the facility.(2) The risk assessment may be performed by an outside consultant to be paid by the health facility.(b) Review.--Each committee shall meet quarterly to review all incidents of workplace violence, to review compliance with the program and the effectiveness of the program, to initiate changes to the program where necessary and to perform any other 20250HB0926PN1597 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 duties required under this act. The committee shall report annually the results of the reviews to the department together with any changes to the program adopted by the committee. If no changes are adopted in response to the review, the committee shall report that fact to the department.(c) Preparation of report and establishment of program.--Each committee shall:(1) Prepare a report from the risk assessment evaluation and establish a written violence prevention program to mitigate risks based on the assessment. If there is more than one health facility within a system, there shall be a program established for each health facility. The program shall be updated annually.(2) Develop and maintain a detailed, written violence prevention plan that:(i) identifies and tracks incidents of workplace violence at the facility;(ii) identifies workplace risks;(iii) establishes a system to identify and flag individuals with a history of violence; and(iv) provides specific methods to address workplace risks.(3) Make the risk assessment report available to the members of the committee.(4) Establish a method to expedite reporting and review of a report of workplace violence and make written recommendations to the health facility management on preventing additional incidents of similar workplace violence.(5) Promptly after adopting a violence prevention plan, 20250HB0926PN1597 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 file a copy of the plan with the department.(d) Employee training.--The committee shall provide appropriate employee training to employees at the time of hire and annually thereafter.Section 5. Reporting of workplace violence.(a) Reporting.--An employee who reasonably believes that an incident of workplace violence has occurred shall report the occurrence of the incident in accordance with the violence prevention plan of the health facility unless the employee knows a report has already been made. The report shall be made immediately after the occurrence or discovery of the incident of workplace violence or as soon thereafter as reasonably practicable.(b) Local law enforcement reporting.--It shall be considered a violation of this act to interfere with or discourage an employee from exercising the employee's right to contact or file a report with law enforcement regarding an incident of workplace violence.(c) Retaliation.--An employee who reports the occurrence of an incident of workplace violence or encourages others to provide information regarding an incident of workplace violence under subsection (a) may not be subject to discrimination, dismissal, discipline, discharge or any other decision adverse to the employee, unless the employee knowingly makes a false report of an incident of workplace violence or is the perpetrator of an incident of workplace violence or other prohibited workplace behavior that resulted in a report by another employee.(d) Maintenance of records.--A health facility shall maintain a report of an incident of workplace violence, 20250HB0926PN1597 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including records or documents regarding the report, for a period of no less than three years. A health facility that fails to comply with this subsection, including falsifying the information required under section 9, shall be in violation of this act and subject to the penalties specified under section 7.Section 6. Distribution of reports of workplace violence.A report of an incident of workplace violence that is submitted to management or to the health facility shall be provided to the committee within 72 hours of the submission of the report.Section 7. Penalties.(a) Administrative fine.--The department may levy an administrative fine on a health facility that violates this act or any regulation adopted under this act. The fine shall be not less than $1,000 and not more than $10,000 for each violation.(b) Administrative order.--The department may order a health facility to take an action that the department deems necessary to correct a violation of this act, including payment of restitution to an employee, a directive to change a policy or procedure or a directive to remedy a retaliation prohibited under section 5(c).(c) Administrative agency law.--This section is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 8. Remedies.(a) General rule.--If a health facility has engaged in conduct that causes or maintains a substantial risk of further workplace violence, including failing to implement the recommendations of a committee, a court may enjoin the health 20250HB0926PN1597 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility from engaging in the illegal activities and may order any other relief that is appropriate, including, but not limited to:(1) reinstatement of an employee;(2) removal of the offending party from the employee's work environment;(3) reimbursement for lost wages;(4) medical expenses;(5) compensation for emotional distress; and(6) attorney fees.(b) Reports to department.--(1) If a committee concludes that a health facility has failed to implement the safety recommendations of the committee, the committee, by vote of a majority of the members, may report the health facility's failure to the department.(2) If, after an investigation, the department determines that the health facility is acting in bad faith and failing to implement safety recommendations of the committee, the department may impose penalties against the health facility, including appropriate fines and administrative penalties in accordance with section 7.(3) Additionally, any individual has the ability to file a complaint with the department for a violation of this act.(4) If an activity, policy or practice has been reported to management and, after reasonable opportunity for correction, the problem has not been corrected or resolved and an employee or a representative of the employees still believes that a violation of the workplace violence prevention program remains or that substantial risk of 20250HB0926PN1597 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 workplace violence exists, such employee or representative of the employees may request an inspection by giving notice to the department of such a violation or risk. Such notice and request shall be in writing, shall specify with reasonable particularity the grounds for the notice and shall be signed by the employee or representative of employees. A copy of such notice shall be provided to the employer, except that on the request of the person giving notice, such person's name shall be withheld. If the department finds such a complaint to be credible, an inspection shall be made by the department.(5) A representative of the employer and employees shall be given the opportunity to accompany the department representative during the inspection.Section 9. Subpoenas and inspections.(a) Subpoenas.--The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee who has investigatory subpoena authority may issue a subpoena upon the application of an attorney of the Office of General Counsel assigned by the department for the purpose of investigating alleged violations of this act. The department may make an application to the Commonwealth Court to enforce a subpoena under this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to excuse a person from producing documents and records as requested by the department under any other provision of State law.(b) Inspections.--The department may obtain information to investigate an alleged violation of this act or determine compliance with this act, including entering and inspecting a health facility at a reasonable time for the purpose of interviewing employees and inspecting and obtaining copies of 20250HB0926PN1597 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 records, reports, documents or other information in any medium.Section 10. Effect on collective bargaining agreements.This act may not be construed to:(1) Supersede a current provision of an employee's existing collective bargaining agreement which provides greater rights and protection than prescribed by this act.(2) Prevent any new provisions of a collective bargaining agreement which provides greater rights and protections from being implemented and applicable to an employee.Section 11. Postincident services.Following an incident of workplace violence, a health facility shall, at a minimum, offer immediate postincident services, including any necessary acute medical treatment or mental health services for each employee of the health facility who is directly involved in the incident of workplace violence.Section 12. Requirements.(a) Signage required.--A health facility shall post signs provided by the department at all public entrances of the health facility to notify individuals entering the health facility that the assault of an employee is considered a felony.(b) Development of signs.--The department shall consult with the health facility industry in developing the signs required under subsection (a).Section 13. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede or relieve a health facility from obligations and requirements set forth under a Federal or State law, regulation, rule or guideline governing health facilities.Section 14. Rules and regulations.20250HB0926PN1597 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this act. The rules and regulations shall include guidelines the department deems appropriate regarding workplace violence prevention programs required under this act and related to reporting and monitoring systems and employee training.Section 15. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0926PN1597 - 11 - 1234567